Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-545
Waterworks; additional tax; when authorized.

Every city of the second class and village in the State of Nebraska which owns its own water plant and a system of hydrants in connection with such water plant is hereby authorized and empowered to provide a fund upon the presentation to the city council or village board of trustees of a petition signed by sixty percent of the legal voters of the city or village, in addition to the general fund of such city or village, by making a levy at the time authorized by law, not to exceed two and one-tenth cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property of the city or village, for the purpose of paying the expense or aiding in paying the expense of maintaining such system of hydrants and pumping and supplying through them water for public purposes.

Laws 1915, c. 217, § 1, p. 486;

C.S.1922, § 4294;

C.S.1929, § 17-443;

R.S.1943, § 17-545;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 17, p. 939;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 54;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 55;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 170.